Washington statutes.
RCW 36.22.230

Election assistants, deputies—Additional qualifications.

Each deputy or assistant appointed under RCW 36.22.220 shall have been graduated from an accredited high school or shall have passed a high school equivalency examination. Each shall be knowledgeable in the rules and laws of conducting elections.

[ 1992 c 163 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1992 c 163 ss 5-13: See note following RCW 29A.04.530.